Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1333. Department of labor — Authority and duties of the director.

The director shall administer the employment security law, chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, the minimum wage law, chapter 15, title 44, Idaho Code, the provisions of chapter 6, title 45, Idaho Code, relating to claims for wages, the provisions of section 44-1812, Idaho Code, relating to minimum medical and health standards for paid firefighters, the disability determinations service established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 421, and shall perform such other duties relating to labor and workforce development as may be imposed by law. The director shall be the successor in law to the office enumerated in section 1, article XIII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The director shall have the authority to employ individuals, make expenditures, require reports, make investigations, perform travel and take other actions deemed necessary. The director shall organize the department of labor, which is hereby created and which shall, for the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive department of the state government.

The director shall have the authority pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to adopt, amend, or rescind rules as deemed necessary for the proper performance of all duties imposed by law.

Subject to the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code, the director is authorized and directed to provide for a merit system for the department covering all persons, except the director, the division administrators and two (2) exempt positions to serve at the pleasure of the director.

The director shall make recommendations for amendments to the employment security law and other laws the director is charged to implement as deemed proper.

The director shall have all the powers and duties as may have been or could have been exercised by predecessors in law, except those powers and duties granted and reserved to the director of the department of commerce in titles 39, 49 and 67, Idaho Code, and shall be the successor in law to all contractual obligations entered into by predecessors in law, except for those contracts of the department of commerce, or contracts pertaining to any power or duty granted and reserved to the director of the department of commerce in titles 39, 49 and 67, Idaho Code.

The director shall provide administrative support for the commission on human rights pursuant to section 67-5905, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1334. Publications.

The director shall print for distribution to the public labor and workforce development information and any other material deemed relevant and shall furnish the same upon request.

§ 72-1335. Personnel.

The director is authorized to appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the duties and powers of such officers, employees, and other persons as may be necessary. The director may delegate to any such person such power and authority as he deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter, and may, in the time, form and manner prescribed by chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code, bond persons handling moneys or signing checks hereunder, such bond to be paid from the employment security administration fund.

Subject only to the provisions of this chapter and such rules as the director may prescribe, the director is authorized and directed to establish and maintain a group pension plan providing retirement, disability, and death benefits for employees of the department through the means of group contracts negotiated with an insurer, licensed and qualified to do business under the laws of the state of Idaho.
(2)(a) Subject only to the provisions of this chapter and such rules as the director may prescribe, the director is authorized and directed to establish and maintain a group pension plan providing retirement, disability, and death benefits for employees of the department through the means of group contracts negotiated with an insurer, licensed and qualified to do business under the laws of the state of Idaho.

Employees covered by the plan shall include all employees (other than temporary and hourly-rated employees) who are in employee status with the department and whose employment commenced before October 1, 1980.

Credited service shall mean all service by employees in the employ of the department (exclusive of leaves without pay other than military leave) as follows:

Past service rendered prior to the effective date of the plan by employees; for this purpose prior service shall include service in any of the predecessor, component organizations thereof, as determined appropriate by the director on the effective date, and shall also include leave-of-absence for military service occurring within a period of otherwise continuous service in any such predecessor organizations.

Future service rendered on and after said effective date.

An employee of the department placed on loan or special duty with other governmental units may be deemed to be in credited service when the costs of continuing credited service are made reimbursable in accordance with an agreement approved by the director.

For each year of credited service each employee covered under the plan shall receive a monthly pension commencing upon retirement at or after age sixty-five (65) and continuing until death, of not less than one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of monthly earnings, except that appropriate schedules and conditions for service retirement, early retirement, disability retirement, and contingency annuity options shall be included in the insurance plan. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section to the contrary, the director is authorized and directed to negotiate with the insurer to invest any interest, dividends, earnings, or other moneys accruing to the funds financing the employees’ retirement program with the insurer to purchase additional retirement benefits. The purchase of said additional benefits shall be contingent upon actuarial appraisals of the plan and shall be based on sound actuarial principles. Total retirement benefits to be provided under the program shall meet the requirements of the Internal Revenue Service for integration purposes.

The cost of past service, future service and disability pensions shall be calculated according to sound actuarial principles. The costs of the plan, including funding of past service pensions which shall be funded over a period of time consistent with good insurance practices, shall be paid from administrative funds available to the department. Each employee covered under the plan shall by payroll deduction contribute toward the cost of future service pensions at not less than the rate paid by the department, but not to exceed seven percent (7%) of monthly earnings.
(f) Upon termination of service, an employee may elect to receive the refund of his contributions plus interest or may elect to have the tax-deferred contributions and interest directly rolled over to an individual retirement account or annuity or to another qualified retirement plan that accepts the roll over, pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 402(c). A vested employee, as provided in the insurance contract, who leaves his contributions in the plan will remain entitled to the pension purchased by the contributions made on his behalf, and all other privileges under the plan.

(g) If an employee dies more than ten (10) years before his normal retirement date, all of his contributions plus interest will be returned to a previously-named beneficiary, subject to survivor benefits as provided in the plan. The following provisions of this subsection shall be subject to a contingency annuity option. If an employee dies on or after the date ten (10) years prior to his normal retirement date, it will be assumed that he retired on the first day of the month following his date of death, and his beneficiary shall receive, beginning on the assumed retirement date, one hundred twenty (120) monthly pension payments. The amount of monthly pension payable will be based on the credit accrued to that time and the employee’s assumed earlier retirement age. If death occurs after retirement but before one hundred twenty (120) monthly pension payments have been made, the monthly pension will be continued to his beneficiary until a total of one hundred twenty (120) monthly payments have been made.

§ 72-1336. Advisory body and special committees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 47, § 3, effective March 12, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 72-1201 et seq.

§ 72-1336A. Youth employment and job training programs. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 47, § 3, effective March 12, 2018. For present comparable provisions,§ 72-1201 et seq.

§ 72-1337. Records and reports.

Each employer that is a “covered employer,” as defined in section 72-1315, Idaho Code, shall complete and submit to the director an Idaho business registration form within six (6) months of becoming a covered employer.

Each employer shall keep accurate records, for such periods of time and containing such information as the director may prescribe. Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied by the director at any reasonable time. The director, a member of the commission or an appeals examiner may require from any employer any sworn or unsworn reports which are deemed necessary in the exercise of their duties.

§ 72-1338. Oaths and witnesses.

The director, a member of the commission, and an appeals examiner shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence deemed necessary in connection with a disputed claim or in the exercise of their duties.

§ 72-1339. Enforcement of subpoenas.

Any subpoena issued pursuant to section 72-1338, Idaho Code, may be enforced by the district courts of this state within the jurisdiction in which the inquiry is being conducted or within the jurisdiction in which the person to whom the subpoena was issued resides or conducts his business. The court shall have jurisdiction to hear the parties, determine the reasonableness of the subpoena, and set aside, modify, or enforce the subpoena by its order in accordance with the evidence. Any failure to obey such court order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

§ 72-1340. Protection against self-incrimination.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing documentary evidence before the director, the commission, or an appeals examiner, or in obedience to the subpoena of any of them, on the ground that the testimony or documentary evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture; but no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce documentary evidence except that the individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

§ 72-1341. Federal-state cooperation.

The director shall cooperate with the United States department of labor, and is directed to take such action as may be necessary to secure to Idaho all advantages under federal laws providing for federal-state cooperation in the administration of unemployment insurance laws, the reduction or prevention of unemployment, and the full development of the workforce resources of this state. The director shall cooperate with the United States department of labor with regards to the receipt or expenditure by this state of moneys granted under any federal acts and shall comply with the requirements of the United States department of labor in preparing reports and ensuring the correctness of the reports.

The director is authorized to make investigations, secure and transmit information, make available services and facilities and exercise other powers provided herein to facilitate the administration of any state or federal unemployment insurance or public employment service law. The director may utilize information, services and facilities made available to the state by any agency charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance or public employment service law.

§ 72-1342. Disclosure of information.

Employment security information, as defined in section 74-106(7), Idaho Code, shall be exempt from disclosure as provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, except that such information may be disclosed as is necessary for the proper administration of programs under this chapter or may be made available to public officials for use in the performance of official duties subject to such restrictions and fees as the director may by rule prescribe. The director may by rule prescribe the form of written, informed consent by a person that is adequate for disclosure of employment security information pertaining to that person to a third party, as provided in section 74-106(7), Idaho Code, and the security requirements and cost provisions that apply to such disclosures.

§ 72-1343. Preservation and destruction of records.

The director may make such summaries or reproductions of records in his custody in whatever form for the effective and economical preservation of the information contained therein, and such summaries or reproductions, duly authenticated, shall be admissible in any proceeding under this chapter if the original records would have been admissible.

The director may order the destruction or disposition of records in his custody if the preservation of such records is not necessary for the proper performance of his duties.

§ 72-1344. Reciprocal arrangements and cooperation.

The director is authorized to enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate agencies of other states or of the federal government, or both, whereby:

An employer of an individual who customarily provides services for the employer in more than one (1) state may elect to have the services deemed performed entirely in one (1) state if the state is one in which: (i) any part of the individual’s services are performed, or (ii) the individual has his residence, or (iii) the employer maintains a place of business, provided the individual agrees with the election and the agency charged with the administration of such state’s unemployment insurance law approves it;

Potential rights to benefits accumulated under the unemployment insurance laws of the federal government may constitute the basis for the payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency under terms which the director finds will be fair to all affected interests and will not result in a substantial loss to the employment security fund;

The director shall participate in any wage combining plan that the secretary of labor may approve as provided in 26 U.S.C. 3304(a)(9)(B) of the federal unemployment tax act. Other arrangements outside the scope of the federal plan may be entered into if fair and reasonable provisions for reimbursement to the employment security fund for any benefits paid are included. Under such a plan, wages or services, upon the basis of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under an unemployment insurance law of another state or of the federal government, may be deemed to be wages for covered employment for the purpose of determining his rights to benefits under this chapter, and wages for covered employment, on the basis of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under this chapter, may be deemed to be wages or services on the basis of which unemployment insurance under the law of another state or of the federal government is payable; and

Contributions due under this act with respect to wages for covered employment shall for the purposes of sections 72-1354 through 72-1364, Idaho Code, be deemed to have been paid to the employment security fund as of the date payment was made as contributions therefor under another state or federal unemployment insurance law. No such arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains provisions for reimbursement to the fund of such contributions as the director finds will be fair to all affected interests.

Reimbursements paid from the employment security fund pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to be benefits for the purposes of this chapter. The director is authorized to make and receive reimbursements to and from other state or federal agencies in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

The director is authorized to enter into arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under this chapter and facilities and services provided under the unemployment insurance law of any foreign government may be utilized for taking claims and paying benefits.

§ 72-1345. State employment service.

A state employment service shall be operated as part of the department. The director shall establish and maintain free public employment offices as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter, and for the purpose of performing the functions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, 29 U.S.C. 49. The provisions of said act are accepted by this state, and the department is designated the agency of this state for the purposes of said act. The department shall provide priority service for veterans in cooperation with the United States veterans employment service.

§ 72-1345A. Idaho career information system. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 47, § 3, effective March 12, 2018. For present comparable provisions,§ 72-1201 et seq.

§ 72-1346. Employment security fund.

Establishment and Control. There is established in the state treasury, separate and apart from all other funds of this state, an “Employment Security Fund,” which shall be perpetually appropriated to the director to be administered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the social security act. This fund shall consist of all contributions collected pursuant to this chapter, payments in lieu of contributions, interest earned upon any moneys in the fund, any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund, all earnings of such property or securities, moneys temporarily deposited in the clearing account, and all other moneys received for the fund from any other source.

Accounts and Deposits. The state controller shall maintain within the fund three (3) separate accounts: (i) a clearing account, (ii) an unemployment trust fund account, and (iii) a benefit account. Upon receipt by the director, all moneys payable to the fund shall be promptly forwarded to the state treasurer for immediate deposit in the clearing account. After clearance, all moneys in the clearing account shall, except as otherwise provided, be deposited promptly with the secretary of the treasury of the United States to the credit of this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund established and maintained pursuant to section 904 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1104), any provisions of law in this state to the contrary notwithstanding. The benefit account shall consist of all moneys requisitioned for the payment of benefits from this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund. Moneys in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited by the state treasurer under the direction of the director in any depository bank in which general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium shall be paid out of the fund. Moneys in the clearing and benefit accounts shall not be commingled with other state funds and shall be maintained in separate accounts on the books of the depository bank. Such moneys shall be secured by the depository bank in the same manner as required by the general public depository law of this state and collateral pledged for this purpose shall be kept separate and distinct from collateral pledged to secure other funds of the state. The state treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the employment security fund.

Withdrawals. Moneys requisitioned by the director through the treasurer from this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund shall be used exclusively for the payment of benefits and for refunds pursuant to section 72-1357, Idaho Code, except that Reed act moneys credited to this state’s account pursuant to section 903 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1103), shall be used exclusively as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The director through the treasurer shall requisition from the federal unemployment trust fund such amounts, not exceeding the amounts standing to this state’s account therein, as he deems necessary for the payment of benefits and refunds for a reasonable period. Upon receipt, such moneys shall be deposited in the benefit account. Expenditures of moneys in the benefit and clearing accounts shall not require the approval of the board of examiners or be subject to any provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their custody. The residual daily balance in the benefit account may be invested in accordance with the cash management improvement act of 1990, and earnings on those investments may be used to pay the related banking costs of maintaining the benefit account. Any earnings in excess of the related banking costs shall be returned to the state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund annually. All warrants issued for the payment of benefits and refunds shall bear the signature of the director. Upon agreement between the director and state controller, amounts in the benefit account may be transferred to a revolving account established and maintained in a depository bank from which the director may provide for the payment of benefits and refunds. Moneys so transferred shall be deposited subject to the same requirements as provided with respect to moneys in the clearing and benefit accounts in subsection (2) of this section. Any balance of moneys requisitioned from the federal unemployment trust fund which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account or revolving account after the expiration of the period for which such sums were requisitioned, may be utilized for the payment of benefits and refunds during succeeding periods, or, in the discretion of the director, shall be redeposited with the secretary of the treasury of the United States to the credit of this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund.
(4) Reed Act Moneys. Reed act moneys credited to this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund by the secretary of the treasury of the United States pursuant to section 903 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1103) may be requisitioned and used for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter. Moneys may only be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter if the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of a specific appropriation by the legislature which specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and the amounts appropriated therefor. Such appropriation is subject to the following conditions:

Such money may not be obligated after the close of the two (2) year period which began on the date of the enactment of the appropriation law; and

The amount which may be obligated at any time may not exceed the amount by which the aggregate of the amounts transferred to the account of this state pursuant to section 903 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1103) exceeds the aggregate of the amounts used by this state and charged against the amounts transferred to the account of this state. For the purposes of this subsection, amounts obligated for administrative purposes pursuant to an appropriation shall be chargeable against transferred amounts at the exact time the obligation is entered into.

(5) Reed act moneys requisitioned for the payment of benefits shall be deposited in the benefit account established in this section. Reed act moneys requisitioned for the payment of administrative expenses pursuant to a specific appropriation shall be deposited in the employment security administration fund, section 72-1347, Idaho Code, except that moneys appropriated for the purchase of lands and buildings shall be deposited in the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund in accordance with section 72-1348, Idaho Code. Money so deposited shall, until expended, remain part of the employment security fund and, if not expended, shall be promptly returned to this state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund.

§ 72-1346A. Advances under title XII of the social security act to employment security fund — Federal Advance Interest Repayment Fund.

In the event the director determines that it is necessary to obtain advances from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to title XII of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1321), and that a request for such advances is authorized under section 1201 of the social security act, or under any other act of congress extending such authority, the director shall request the governor to make application to the secretary of labor of the United States for such advances.

The governor is authorized to make application to the secretary of labor of the United States to obtain advances pursuant to title XII of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1321 et seq.). Funds so advanced shall be for the payment of unemployment insurance benefits.

Any amount transferred to the employment security fund by the secretary of the treasury of the United States in accordance with this section shall be repaid from the employment security fund as provided in section 1202 of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1322).

There is established in the state treasury the “Federal Advance Interest Repayment Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys collected pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and interest earned upon any moneys in the fund. All moneys in the fund are perpetually appropriated to the director for the payment of interest on any advance made to this state pursuant to title XII of the social security act, except that if, at the end of any calendar year, all advances and interest have been repaid, any remaining balance in the fund shall be transferred to the employment security fund. Interest charges due and payable pursuant to section 1202 of the social security act, may be paid by the director from the federal advance interest repayment fund. Such expenditures shall not be subject to any law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their custody, nor shall such expenditures require the approval of the board of examiners.

A federal advance interest repayment tax may be levied in accordance with the following provisions when required under paragraph (b) of this subsection:

On the first day of the third month of a calendar quarter, the director shall:

Estimate the interest payable on federal advances obtained under subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

Estimate the amount of federal advance interest repayment tax receipts expected to be collected during the quarter for any preceding calendar quarter in which such tax was assessed;

Add the amount in the federal advance interest repayment fund on the last day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter to the estimate in paragraph (ii) of this subsection; and

Subtract the sum obtained in paragraph (iii) from the estimate in paragraph (i) of this subsection.

If the remainder obtained under paragraph (iv) of subsection (5)(a) of this section is more than zero, each covered employer subject to this section may, at the director’s sole discretion, be assessed a federal advance interest repayment tax. Such tax shall be a percentage of the contributions payable under sections 72-1349 and 72-1350, Idaho Code, for the calendar quarter, but in no case shall be less than one dollar ($1.00). The percentage shall be determined by dividing the remainder in paragraph (iv) of subsection (5)(a) of this section by the estimated amount of contributions due and payable on wages paid during the quarter. The percentage shall be rounded up to the next one-tenth of a percent (0.1%).

The tax assessed shall be collected and paid in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe. All such taxes collected shall be deposited in the federal advance interest repayment fund. Any such tax imposed in a calendar quarter shall be paid on or before the last day of the second month following the close of such calendar quarter. An extension of time for payment may be granted for good cause in accordance with section 72-1349(4), Idaho Code.

If any covered employer fails to pay such tax on or before the date on which they are due, such tax shall bear penalty at a rate of five dollars ($5.00) for each month or fraction thereof until paid; provided, that in no case shall the penalty exceed the actual amount of the tax due and payable. The date of payment shall be deemed the date of actual receipt by the director, or if mailed, the date of mailing. Penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the federal advance interest payment fund. Furthermore, if any employer becomes delinquent in making payment of the tax as required by this subsection, such employer shall be subject to the collection provisions in sections 72-1355 and 72-1360, Idaho Code.

A covered employer may make application to the director for a refund or credit of any amount erroneously paid as tax under this subsection. Such applications and the director’s determinations regarding them shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1357, Idaho Code.

This section does not apply to covered employers eligible and electing the cost reimbursement payment method under section 72-1349A, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1346B. Unemployment benefit bonds.

The Idaho housing and finance association, upon the request from and agreement with the director, may contract indebtedness and issue or cause to be issued unemployment benefit bonds or notes evidencing such indebtedness in conformity with chapter 62, title 67, Idaho Code, for the benefit of the department when the director determines that the issuance of bonds for the repayment of federal advances under title XII of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. section 1321 et seq., will result in a savings to the state and to the state’s employers.

Until unemployment benefit bonds and notes as authorized in this section and chapter 62, title 67, Idaho Code, have been paid in full, the following provisions shall apply:

In addition to the requirements of section 72-1347A, Idaho Code, within the employment security reserve fund there is created a bond principal payment account and a bond interest payment account. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the bond principal payment account and twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the bond interest payment account. Moneys in the bond principal payment account shall be used solely for the payment of bond and note principal and moneys in the bond interest payment account shall be used solely for the payment of bond and note interest and other amounts required for the unemployment benefit bonds or notes issued by the Idaho housing and finance association in accordance with this section and chapter 62, title 67, Idaho Code.

Moneys in the bond principal payment account and the bond interest payment account are continuously appropriated in such amounts and at such times as, from time to time, shall be certified by the Idaho housing and finance association to the director, the state treasurer and the state controller as necessary for the payment of principal, interest and other amounts required for unemployment benefit bonds or notes issued by the Idaho housing and finance association in accordance with this section and chapter 62, title 67, Idaho Code, which amounts shall be paid over as directed by the association.

Moneys paid out of the bond principal payment account for principal payments on unemployment benefit bonds or notes shall be repaid from the benefit account in the employment security fund, section 72-1346(2), Idaho Code, out of revenue the department derives from employer contributions payable under sections 72-1349 and 72-1350, Idaho Code.

Moneys paid out of the benefit account to the bond principal payment account as authorized in this section shall be made as soon as possible and in such amounts as deemed necessary by the director to provide funds for the appropriations contained herein to make subsequent principal payments on unemployment benefit bonds or notes when due.

At any time the balance in the benefit account reaches zero (0), the director shall immediately requisition funds from the state’s account in the federal unemployment trust fund, and if funds therein are not then sufficient to pay unemployment insurance benefits, the director shall immediately obtain advances from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund as provided for in section 72-1346A, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1347. Employment security administration fund.

There is established in the state treasury the “Employment Security Administration Fund.” All moneys deposited in said fund are perpetually appropriated to the director. Expenditures from the fund shall be in accordance with this chapter on the approval of the director and shall not require approval by the board of examiners, and shall not lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund, except that the director may establish a revolving fund for the purpose of paying current cash items in connection with administrative expenses. All moneys in this fund which are received from the federal government shall be expended solely for the purposes and in the amounts found necessary by the secretary, United States department of labor, for the proper and efficient administration of this chapter. The fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated by this state to this fund, all moneys received from the United States for this fund, all moneys received from any other source for such purpose, and any moneys received from the United States or any other state as compensation for services or facilities supplied to such agency, any amounts received pursuant to any surety bond or insurance policy or from other sources for losses sustained by the fund or by reason of damage to equipment or supplies purchased from moneys in such fund, and any proceeds realized from the sale or disposition of any such equipment or supplies. Such moneys shall be secured by the depository in which they are held as required by the general depository law of the state, chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code, and collateral pledged shall be maintained in a separate custody account. The state treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the fund.

Reimbursement of fund. If any moneys received from the United States department of labor under title III of the social security act, are found by the United States department of labor to have been lost or expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of, those found necessary by the United States department of labor for the proper administration of this chapter, such moneys shall be replaced by moneys in the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as provided in section 72-1348, Idaho Code, but if the moneys therein are insufficient, the balance shall be replaced by moneys in the department of labor special administration fund, section 72-1347A(3), Idaho Code.